apertium-eng-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ңд%{A%}р COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Алма театрға бара<aor><p3><sg> ма? – Алма в театр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м COMMON-CLITICS ;                    ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASE ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<advl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<ifi_evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;
%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}ш%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;           ! Dir/LR
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>сл%{I%}%{K%} # ;

!%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с # ; FIXME looks wrong

! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>сл%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>у%>ш%{I%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>у GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>у%>ш%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н GER-POSS-REAL ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT-EMPH ;                ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;  ! FIXME check

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. көрін
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жүр, жатыр, тұр, отыр/

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ; ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON Copula

е%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:екен GER-POSS-REAL ;
е%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:екен%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

е%<cop%>%<neg%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<past%>:екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>:емес% екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<ifi%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-12SG-CASES

%<gen%>:енің COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:аған COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:ені COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:енен COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:енде COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:енімен COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<px%>:енікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:ендегі ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ендей COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<adv%>:еніңше COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASE-ETC ;

 LEXICON Verbs
айғайла:айғайла V-IV ; ! "shout,bark at someone"
айқындан:айқындан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
аймала:аймала V-TV ; ! "embrace"
ақыр:ақыр V-IV ; ! ""
алқындыр:алқындыр V-TV ; ! "to complete"
алыс:алыс V-IV ; ! "fight,wrestle"
анықта:анықта V-TV ; ! "elucidate,clarify,define,specify"
аршында:аршында V-TV ; ! "to measure in arshines"
ары:ары V-IV ; ! "to become tired"
аула:аула V-TV ; ! "to hunt"
аунап%-құна:аунап%-құна V-IV ; ! "to rest" FIXME CHECK
әңгімелес:әңгімелес V-IV ; ! "беседовать" FIXME (kazakh) it seems to be coop. form
әсемде:әсемде V-TV ; ! "decorate,adorn,put in"
бағыс:бағыс V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "educate,look after" (kaz tat) coop
барлық:барлық V-IV ; ! "закатиться в плаче"
баррикадала:баррикадала V-TV ; ! "to barricade"
белбеуле:белбеуле V-TV ; ! "to gird"
белсен:белсен V-IV ; ! "train oneself,display activity"
болдыр:болдыр V-TV ; ! "допускать" (kaz tat) caus
болыс:болыс V-IV ; ! "помогать"
бүйт:бүйт V-TV ; ! "do that way"
бұйрала:бұйрала V-TV ; ! "to curl"
бұқ:бұқ V-IV ; ! "to stoop"
дағдылан:дағдылан V-IV ; ! "to arm oneself"
дәрттендір:дәрттендір V-TV ; ! "to inspire"
де:де V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "speak"
де:делін V-TV-PASS ; ! "speak"
еле:еле V-IV ; ! "замечать,обращать внимание" FIXMECHECK
еңсер:еңсер V-TV ; ! "lessen"
есендес:есендес V-IV ; ! "to greet one another"
жайдақта:жайдақта V-TV ; ! "растаптывать"
жалаңда:жалаңда V-IV ; ! "to be greedy"
жампаңда:жампаңда V-TV ; ! ""
жара:жара V-IV ; ! "be useful"
жаудыр:жаудыр V-TV ; ! "" caus
жетеле:жетеле V-TV ; ! "lead by hand"
жетіс:жетіс V-IV ; ! "to ripen (of fruit)"
жоспарла:жоспарла V-TV ; ! "plan"
жүрексін:жүрексін V-IV ; ! ""
жық:жық V-TV ; ! "knock over (passive = fall over)"
ілгерілет:ілгерілет V-TV ; ! "to increase"
кезектес:кезектес V-IV ; ! ""
көзде:көзде V-TV ; ! ""
көр:көрін V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
көр:көр V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
кристалдан:кристалдан V-IV ; ! "to crystallize"
қабылда:қабылда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! ""
қабылда:қабылдан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
қабырғалас:қабырғалас V-IV ; ! "to equal"
қада:қада V-TV ; ! "stick in"
қақа:қақа V-IV ; ! "to rage (of a hard frost)"
қалдыр:қалдыр V-TV ; ! "forsake" (kaz tat) caus
қантала:қантала V-IV ; ! "to be covered with bruises"
қапта:қапта V-TV ; ! "обшивать"
қарқылда:қарқылда V-IV ; ! "to guffaw"
қарыста:қарыста V-TV ; ! "to measure with the thumb and middle fingers spread apart"
қобалж:қобалж V-IV ; ! "to feel sick"
қор:қор V-TV ; ! "to guard"
қорық:қор%{y%}қ V-IV ; ! "to fear" FIXME ы drops out in some forms
құра:құра V-TV ; ! "составлять целое из отдельных частей"
қызықсын:қызықсын V-IV ; ! "to get interested in"
қыршы:қыршы V-TV ; ! "to cut off" (tat) trimm
майыс:майыс V-IV ; ! "to bend oneself or itself"
машиналандыр:машиналандыр V-TV ; ! "mechanize"
мыж:мыж V-IV ; ! "chatter,pester (with)"
мылжала:мылжала V-TV ; ! "cut into pieces,mince"
орында:орында V-TV ; ! "execute"
ота:ота V-IV ; ! "полоть"
өрле:өрле V-IV ; ! "ascend,rise"
өсір:өсір V-TV ; ! "" (kaz tat) caus
реформала:реформала V-TV ; ! "to reform"
сайра:сайра V-IV ; ! "to sing (of birds)"
сасы:сасы V-IV ; ! "stink"
сәлелендір:сәлелендір V-TV ; ! "expose"
сол:сол V-IV ; ! "to dry up"
сотта:сотта V-TV ; ! "to be tried"
сыйла:сыйла V-TV ; ! "to make a present"
сыйыс:сыйыс V-IV ; ! "to get on (with someone)"
талықсы:талықсы V-IV ; ! "to be semiconscious"
тат:тат V-TV ; ! "taste" (tat) trimm
телмір:телмір V-IV ; ! "to stare"
тілімде:тілімден V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
торсылда:торсылда V-IV ; ! "трескаться"
төле:төле V-TV ; ! ""
тыйын:тыйын V-IV ; ! "to suppress" refl
тындыр:тындыр V-TV ; ! "to put an end to an affair" (tat) trimm
шақ:шақ V-TV ; ! "sting,bite"
шақылда:шақылда V-IV ; ! "to squeak"
шықырлат:шықырлат V-TV ; ! "to cause grinding of teeth" (kaz tat) caus
ыңқылда:ыңқылда V-IV ; ! "to moan"
төн:төн V-IV ; ! ""
тасымалда:тасымалда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "move, transfer"
тасымалда:тасымалдан V-TV-PASS ; ! "move, transfer"
жұм:жұм V-TV ; ! ""
жалтақта:жалтақта V-IV ; ! ""
жат:жатыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
ал:ал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
баста:баста Vinfl-AUX ; !
бер:бер Vinfl-AUX ; !
біт:біт Vinfl-AUX ; !
бітір:бітір Vinfl-AUX ; !
бол:бол Vinfl-AUX ; !
ет:ет Vinfl-AUX ; ! ""
жазда:жазда Vinfl-AUX ; !
жат:жат Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
кел:кел Vinfl-AUX ; !
кет:кет Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
қал:қал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал:сал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал%<vaux%>%<ger%>:салыш GER-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
шық:шық Vinfl-AUX ; !
идентификацияла:идентификацияла V-TV ; ! "identity"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
керек:керек Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! "  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
жатыр:жатыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! "  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
жатқан% жоқ:жатқан% жоқ Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! "  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
емес:емес Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! "  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
